Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.260

Registration by coordination or qualification—Offer and sale—Duration of effectiveness.

When securities are registered by coordination or qualification, they may be offered and sold by the issuer, any other person on whose behalf they are registered or by any registered broker-dealer or any person acting within the exemption provided in RCW 21.20.040. Every registration shall remain effective until its expiration date or until revoked by the director or until terminated upon request of the registrant with the consent of the director. All outstanding securities of the same class as a registered security are considered to be registered for the purpose of any nonissuer transaction.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 13; 1974 ex.s. c 77 s 5; 1959 c 282 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 77: See note following RCW 21.20.040.